Washington statutes.
RCW 16.68.130

Right of access to premises and records.

The director or his or her authorized agent, shall have free and uninterrupted access to all parts of premises that come under the provisions of this chapter, for the purpose of making inspections and the examination of records.

[ 2011 c 336 s 443; 1949 c 100 s 14; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 3142-14.]